Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.340.040

Adoption of salary schedules—Computation of fringe benefits.

(1) School districts participating in a cooperative project pursuant to RCW 28A.340.030 may adopt identical salary schedules following compliance with chapter 41.59 RCW: PROVIDED, That if the districts participating in a cooperative project adopt identical salary schedules, the participating districts shall be considered a single school district for purposes of establishing compliance with the salary limitations of RCW 28A.400.200(3) but not for the purposes of allocation of state funds.

(2) For purposes of computing fringe benefit contributions for purposes of establishing compliance with RCW 28A.400.200(3)(b), the districts participating in a cooperative project pursuant to RCW 28A.340.030 may use the greater of: (a) The highest amount provided in the 1986-87 school year by a district participating in the cooperative project; or (b) the amount authorized for such purposes in the state operating appropriations act in effect at the time.

[ 1990 c 33 s 369; 1988 c 268 s 5. Formerly RCW 28A.100.086.]

NOTES:

Findings—Severability—1988 c 268: See notes following RCW 28A.340.010.